Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-876
Student teacher or intern; protection; rules and regulations; comply.

A student teacher or intern under the supervision of a certificated teacher, principal, or other administrator shall have the protection of the laws accorded the certificated teacher, principal, or other administrator and shall, while acting as such student teacher or intern, comply with all rules and regulations of the local board of education and observe all duties assigned certificated teachers.

Laws 1971, LB 175, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1298;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 501.